Washington statutes.
RCW 11.12.040

Revocation of will—How effected—Effect on codicils.

(1) A will, or any part thereof, can be revoked:

(a) By a subsequent will that revokes, or partially revokes, the prior will expressly or by inconsistency; or

(b) By being burnt, torn, canceled, obliterated, destroyed, or a physical act, with the intent and for the purpose of revoking the same, by the testator or by another person in the presence and by the direction of the testator. If such act is done by any person other than the testator, the direction of the testator and the facts of such injury or destruction must be proved by two witnesses.

(2) Revocation of a will in its entirety revokes its codicils, unless revocation of a codicil would be contrary to the testator's intent.

[ 2021 c 140 s 1014; 1994 c 221 s 12; 1965 c 145 s 11.12.040. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 28; RRS s 1398; prior: Code 1881 s 1321; 1863 p 207 s 55; 1860 p 170 s 22.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 140 ss 1001-1016: See note following RCW 11.12.400.

Effective dates—1994 c 221: See note following RCW 11.100.035.